Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129D.045, is amended to read: 129D.045 REGIONAL ARTS COUNCILS. A portion of each appropriation to the board shall be used for statewide distribution through the regional arts council system. new text begin Except when otherwise provided by section 129D.175, new text end these organizations shall work together to determine a formula for distributing the funds to the regions. The board serves as fiscal agent for distribution of the funds to each regional arts council. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129D.17, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. deleted text begin Minnesota Statedeleted text end Arts deleted text begin Boarddeleted text end allocation. At least 47 percent of the total appropriations from the arts and cultural heritage fund in a fiscal biennium must be for grants and services awarded through the Minnesota State Arts Boarddeleted text begin ,deleted text end or regional arts councilsnew text begin ,new text end subject to appropriationnew text begin and distributed according to section 129D.175new text end . Sec. 3. new text begin [129D.175] ARTS ALLOCATION DISTRIBUTION FORMULA. new text end new text begin The amount appropriated under section 129D.17, subdivision 4, must be divided by a divisor equal to the number of regional arts councils plus one. The resulting quotient is the amount to be distributed to the Minnesota State Arts Board for grants and services administered by the board. The remaining amount is distributed, by the Minnesota State Arts Board as fiscal agent, to the regional arts councils on a per capita basis. new text end